Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 2
SICKLE-CELL ANEMIA TREATMENT AND RESEARCH CENTER

23-21-201. Legislative declaration.

In order to foster the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state and to facilitate the research and treatment of sickle-cell anemia and related diseases, it is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to achieve the maximum practical degree of care and treatment for persons suffering from this and related diseases.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 767, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-42-1.

23-21-202. Definitions.

As used in this part 2, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Committee" means the sickle-cell anemia advisory committee.

"Sickle-cell anemia" means an inherited blood disease caused by abnormal hemoglobin (oxygen-carrying pigment) in the red blood cells, causing the red blood cells to form a crescent or sickle shape when deprived of sufficient oxygen.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 767, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-42-2.

23-21-203. Center created - committee established.

There is hereby established the sickle-cell anemia treatment and research center within the university of Colorado school of medicine. Such treatment center shall use existing facilities and staff of the university of Colorado school of medicine and may establish programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from sickle-cell anemia as they are needed. The treatment center shall assist those persons who require continuing treatment for sickle-cell anemia but who are unable to pay for the entire cost of such services on a continuing basis despite the existence of various types of hospital and medical insurance, medicare, medicaid, and other government assistance programs, and private charitable assistance.

The governor shall appoint a committee, to be known as the sickle-cell anemia advisory committee, to consult with the university of Colorado school of medicine in the administration of this part 2.

The committee consists of eleven members representing hospitals, voluntary agencies interested in sickle-cell anemia, medical specialists in sickle-cell anemia patient care, and the general public; but no group shall have more than four members on the committee.

Each member of the committee shall hold office for a term of four years and until the member's successor is appointed; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than six members' terms expire in the same year.

Any vacancy occurring on the committee shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the unexpired term.

The committee shall meet at least annually and at such other times as the executive director of the department of public health and environment deems necessary.

Members of the committee serve without compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 767, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-42-3.

L. 74:

(2) amended, p. 411, § 38, effective April 11.

L. 86:

(2) amended, p. 413, § 22, effective March 26.

L. 89:

(2)(b) repealed, p. 1147, § 3, effective April 6.

L. 94:

(2)(a) amended, p. 2738, § 370, effective July 1.

L. 2022:

(2) amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 32, § 41, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 1994 act amending subsection (2)(a), see section 1 of chapter 345, Session Laws of Colorado 1994.

23-21-204. Duties of the school of medicine.

It is the duty of the school of medicine, with the advice of the committee, to:

Develop standards for determining eligibility for care and treatment under this part 2;

Assist in the development and expansion of programs for the care and treatment of persons suffering from sickle-cell anemia, including home care and medical procedures designed to provide maximum control over the disease;

Extend financial assistance to persons suffering from sickle-cell anemia to obtain efficacious agents of control for use in hospital and medical facilities and in the home;

Institute and carry on educational programs for the detection of sickle-cell anemia in the community and for the counseling of individuals and families;

Conduct educational programs for physicians, hospitals, county and district public health agencies, and the public concerning the methods of care and treatment for persons suffering from the disease;

Establish research programs to promote scientific inquiry into the causes and the possible cure or alleviation of the suffering of victims of sickle-cell anemia.

Source:

L. 73:

p. 768, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 66-42-4.

L. 2010:

(1)(e) amended, (HB 10-1422), ch. 419, p. 2080, § 55, effective August 11.